District of Columbia statutes.
1-521.06

Continuing responsibility of agencies for equal employment opportunity.

Equal employment opportunity is a continuing responsibility of every agency, whether or not the hiring and promotion goals in affirmative action employment plans have been reached.

History

May 6, 1976, D.C. Law 1-63, § 7, 22 DCR 6540

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-512.
1973 Ed., § 1-320f.